Washington statutes.
RCW 43.92.070

Topographic map—Stream measurements.

In order to complete the topographic map of the state and for the purpose of making more extensive stream measurements, and otherwise investigating and determining the water supply of the state, the state geologist may enter into such agreements with the director of the United States geological survey as will ensure that the surveys and investigations be carried on in the most economical manner, and that the maps and data be available for the use of the public as quickly as possible.

[ 2006 c 340 s 7; 1965 c 8 s 43.92.070. Prior: 1909 c 245 s 1; RRS s 5999.]